Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,210
Snowmobiles; registration; fee.

(1) The fee for registration of each snowmobile shall be:

(a) For each snowmobile owned by a person other than dealers or manufacturers, eight dollars per year and one dollar for a duplicate or transfer;

(b) For all snowmobiles owned by a dealer and operated for demonstration or testing purposes, twenty-five dollars per year; and

(c) For all snowmobiles owned by a manufacturer and operated for research, testing, experimentation, or demonstration purposes, one hundred dollars per year.

(2) Snowmobile dealer and manufacturer registrations shall not be transferable.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 210.